Massachusetts, session 194th, S1926.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 64H, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition of the
General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(yy) Sales of electric vehicle supply equipment, as defined in section 2 of chapter 25B, or
individual replacement components of electric vehicle supply equipment, installed in or on
residences.
SECTION 2. Subsection (yy) of said section 6 of said chapter 64H is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 2030.
of 1